src/import/adjectives.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@vägev+A:@P.NomStem.First@vägev MAGUS ;
vähendatav+A:vähendatav MAGUS ;
vähendav+A:vähendav MAGUS ;
väidetav+A:väidetav MAGUS ;
välditav+A:väl,ditav MAGUS ;
välistav+A:välistav MAGUS ;
väljendav+A:väl,jendav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@väljuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´äl,juv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@välkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´älkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vältav+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ältav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vältiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´äl,tiv MAGUS ;
värisev+A:värisev MAGUS ;
värskendav+A:värskendav MAGUS ;
väsitav+A:väsitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@väänduv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´äänduv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@väänlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´äänlev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@vääriv+A:@P.NomStem.First@v´ääriv MAGUS ;
õhetav+A:õhetav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@õhkuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´õhkuv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@õitsev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´õitsev MAGUS ;
õnnestav+A:õnnestav MAGUS ;
õpetatav+A:õpetatav MAGUS ;
õpetav+A:õpetav MAGUS ;
õpitav+A:õpitav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@õppiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´õppiv MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@õõtsuv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´õõtsuv MAGUS ;
õõvastav+A:õõvastav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ähkiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ähkiv MAGUS ;
ähvardav+A:ähvardav MAGUS ;
ängistav+A:ängistav MAGUS ;
äratav+A:äratav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ärev+A:@P.NomStem.First@ärev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ärkav+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ärkav MAGUS ;
ärritatav+A:ärritatav MAGUS ;
ärritav+A:ärritav MAGUS ;
ärrituv+A:ärrituv MAGUS ;
ühendav+A:ühendav MAGUS ;
ühinev+A:ühinev MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ühtiv+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ühtiv MAGUS ;
üldistav+A:ül,distav MAGUS ;
ületav+A:ületav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ülev+A:@P.NomStem.First@ülev MAGUS ;
üllatav+A:üllatav MAGUS ;
ümbritsev+A:ümbritsev MAGUS ;
üritav+A:üritav MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@ütlev+A:@P.NomStem.First@´ütlev MAGUS ;
